src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
@P.Stem.Nom@vagonett+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vagon˘etʲt TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
vagu+N:vaG1u%{stemill%} KAVA  "weight: 8 " ; 
vagulane+N:vagulane OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vagumus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vagumus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vagun+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vagun REDEL  "weight: 8 " ; 
vaguniaken+N:vaguni%#˘akkE2n PIPAR  "weight: 11 " ; 
vaguniesik+N:vaguni%#esik VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
vagunisaatja+N:vaguni%#s˘aatja AASTA  "weight: 10 " ; 
vagunitäis+N:vaguni%#t˘äiS1%{stemill%} VARS  "weight: 11 " ; 
vaguniuks+N:vaguni%#˘uK1s LAPS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vagurus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vagurus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vagusus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vagusus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
vaha+N:vaha KAVA  "weight: 9 " ; 
vahakuju+N:vaha%#kuju KAVA  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vahaküpsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vaha%#k˘üpsus SUULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
vahariie+N:vaha%#r˘iiD1e%{stemill%} PINGE  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahe+N:vahe PERE  "weight: 6 " ; 
vaheaeg+N:vahe%#˘aE4G1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 8 " ; 
vaheaste+N:vahe%#˘astE2 HAARE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vahedus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vahedus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
vaheetapp+N:vahe%#et˘app TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
vahejaam+N:vahe%#j˘aam%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahejuhtum+N:vahe%#j˘uhtum REDEL  "weight: 8 " ; 
vahekasu+N:vahe%#kasu KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vahekaugus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vahe%#k˘augus SUULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
vahekohtunik+N:vahe%#k˘ohtun˘ik ELANIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahekohus+N:vahe%#k˘ohT1u KOHUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahekokkuvõte+N:vahe%#k˘okku%#v˘õtT1e PINGE  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahekord+N:vahe%#k˘orD1%>%{pl.i%} PIIM  "weight: 7 " ; 
vahekäik+N:vahe%#k˘äik%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 9 " ; 
vahelagi+N:vahe%#laG1%{stemill%} NIMI  "weight: 10 " ; 
vaheldi+N:vaheldi AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
vaheldumine+N:vaheldumine OLULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vaheldumus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vaheldumus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vaheldus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vaheldus OLULINE  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vaheldusrikkus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vaheldus%#r˘ikkus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vahelduvus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vahelduvus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahelejätt+N:vahele%#j˘ätt%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahelejäämine+N:vahele%#j˘äämine SUULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
vahelesegamine+N:vahele%#segamine OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
vaheletrügija+N:vahele%#trügija AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahelihas+N:vahe%#lihas SOOLANE  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahelik+N:vˈahel˘ik ELANIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
vaheltkasu+N:vahelt%#kasu KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahelugemine+N:vahe%#lugemine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahelugu+N:vahe%#luG1u%{stemill%} KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahemaa+N:vahe%#m˘aa%>%{id%} PUU  "weight: 8 " ; 
vahemaandumine+N:vahe%#m˘aandumine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahemees+N:vahe%#me MEES  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahemik+N:vˈahem˘ik ELANIK  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vahemärgistus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vahe%#märgistus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vahend+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vahend REDEL  "weight: 6 " ; 
vahendaja+N:vahendaja AASTA  "weight: 8 " ; 
vahendamine+N:vahendamine OLULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vahenditus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vahenditus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vahendus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vahendus OLULINE  "weight: 7 " ; 
vahendusfirma+N:vahendus%#firma PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahendustasu+N:vahendus%#tasu KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahepala+N:vahe%#pala%>%{pl.u%} KAVA  "weight: 10 " ; 
vaheplatvorm+N:vahe%#pl˘atv˘orm TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
vaher+N:vahT1E2r VAHER  "weight: 10 " ; 
vaheraha+N:vahe%#raha KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
vaherahu+N:vahe%#rahu KAVA  "weight: 9 " ; 
vaheruum+N:vahe%#r˘uum RUUM  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahesein+N:vahe%#s˘ein%>%{pl.u%} KAEL  "weight: 9 " ; 
vahetalitaja+N:vahe%#talitaja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vahetalitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vahe%#talitus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahetamine+N:vahetamine OLULINE  "weight: 8 " ; 
vaheti+N:vaheti AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahetumine+N:vahetumine OLULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
vahetund+N:vahe%#t˘unD1 TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vahetus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vahetus OLULINE  "weight: 7 " ; 
vahetuskaup+N:vahetus%#k˘aup%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 10 " ; 
vahetuskurss+N:vahetus%#k˘urss TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
vahetusmängija+N:vahetus%#m˘ängija AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahetusraha+N:vahetus%#raha KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vahhabiit+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vahhab˘iit TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahhabism+N:vahhab˘ism TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahialune+N:vahi%#alune SOOLANE  "weight: 10 " ; 
vahikord+N:vahi%#k˘orD1%>%{pl.i%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahimadrus+N:vahi%#madrus SOOLANE  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahimaja+N:vahi%#maja%>%{pl.u%}%{stemill%} KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahimees+N:vahi%#me MEES  "weight: 8 " ; 
vahipost+N:vahi%#p˘osʲt TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahiputka+N:vahi%#putʲka PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahistamine+N:vahistamine OLULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
vahistatu+N:vahistatu AASTA  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vahistatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vahistatus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vahistus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vahistus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahisõdur+N:vahi%#sõdur REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahitorn+N:vahi%#t˘orn TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahižurnaal+N:vahi%#žurn˘aal TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vahk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘ahK1%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahkviha+N:v˘ahk%#viha KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vaht+N:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘ahT1 TAUD  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vaht+N:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘ahT1%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON  "weight: 8 " ; 
vahtimine+N:v˘ahtimine OLULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
vahtkond+N:v˘ahtk˘onD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV  "weight: 10 " ; 
vahtkondlane+N:v˘ahtk˘ondlane SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahtkonnaruum+N:v˘ahtkonna%#r˘uum RUUM  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahtkonnaülem+N:v˘ahtkonna%#ülem MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahtraleht+N:v˘ahtra%#l˘ehT1%>%{pl.i%} EIT  "weight: 10 " ; 
vahtramets+N:v˘ahtra%#m˘ets%>%{pl.i%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vahtrik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘ahtr˘ik ÄMBLIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahueraldi+N:vahu%#eraldi AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahukoor+N:vahu%#k˘oor%{stemill%} KEEL  "weight: 10 " ; 
vahusti+N:vahusti AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vahustus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vahustus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vahustuvus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vahustuvus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vahutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vahutus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahuvein+N:vahu%#v˘ein TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahuveinipudel+N:vahu%#veini%#pudel REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahuviin+N:vahu%#v˘iin%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vahvel+N:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘ahvel%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vahvus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘ahvus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vahvärk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘ahv˘ärk TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahvärk-maja+N:vahvärk-maja%>%{pl.u%}%{stemill%} KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@D.Stem.Guessed@@P.Stem.Nom@vai+N:@D.Stem.Guessed@@P.Stem.Nom@v˘ai%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 8 " ; 
vaiastik+N:vˈaiast˘ik ELANIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
@R.Part.One@@P.Stem.Nom@vaib+N:@R.Part.One@@P.Stem.Nom@v˘aib TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vaiband+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vaiband REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vaibumatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘aibumatus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
vaibumine+N:v˘aibumine OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
vaidleja+N:v˘aidleja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vaidlematus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘aidlematus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
vaidlemine+N:v˘aidlemine OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vaidlus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘aidlus SUULINE  "weight: 7 " ; 
vaidluskunst+N:v˘aidlus%#k˘unʲst TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vaidlusoskus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘aidlus%#˘oskus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
vaidlustamine+N:vaidlustamine OLULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vaidlustus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vaidlustus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
vaie+N:v˘aiD1e PINGE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vaieldamatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vaieldamatus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vaieldavus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vaieldavus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vaier+N:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘aier REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vaigistamatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vaigistamatus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
vaigisti+N:vaigisti AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
